Massachusetts, session 194th, H2778.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no funds of the
Commonwealth shall be expended for non-employee attorney service or management consultants
for services performed for collective bargaining or issues arising from collective bargaining
contracts.
of 1